Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1380
Dispute; crematory authority or funeral establishment; powers and duties.

(1) If a crematory authority or funeral establishment (a) is aware of any dispute concerning the cremation of human remains or (b) has a reasonable basis to believe that such a dispute exists or to question any of the representations made by the authorizing agent with respect to such remains, until the crematory authority receives a court order that a dispute with respect to such remains has been settled, the crematory authority or funeral establishment may refuse to accept such human remains for cremation or to perform a cremation of such remains.

(2) If a crematory authority or funeral establishment is aware of any dispute concerning the release or disposition of cremated remains, the crematory authority or funeral establishment may refuse to release cremated remains until the dispute has been resolved or the crematory authority or funeral establishment has been provided with a court order authorizing the release or disposition of the cremated remains.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 26.